Missouri, session 2026, HB1735.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 135.478, 135.481, 135.484, and 135.487, RSMo, are repealed
and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 135.478, 135.481,
135.484, and 135.487, to read as follows:
135.478. As used in sections 135.481 to 135.487, the following terms mean:
(1) "Critical revitalization area", an area defined as a National Register-listed
historic district;
(2) "Critical revitalization property", an occupied property that is recognized as
a contributing resource in a National Register-listed historic district and is zoned as
residential, commercial, or mixed use;
(3) "Department", the department of economic development;
[(2)] (4) "Director", the director of the department of economic development;
[(3)] (5) "Distressed community", as defined in section 135.530;
[(4)] (6) "Eligible costs for critical revitalization properties", expenses incurred
for property renovation, including surveys, architectural and engineering services, and
construction costs related to maintenance, functional use, and property viability;
(7) "Eligible costs for a new residence", expenses incurred for property acquisition,
development, site preparation other than demolition, surveys, architectural and engineering
services and construction and all other necessary and incidental expenses incurred for
constructing a new market rate residence, which is or will be owner-occupied, which is not
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1735 2
replacing a national register listed or local historic structure; except that, costs paid for by the
taxpayer with grants or forgivable loans, other than tax credits, provided pursuant to state or
federal governmental programs are ineligible;
[(5)] (8) "Eligible costs for rehabilitation", expenses incurred for the renovation or
rehabilitation of an existing residence including site preparation, surveys, architectural and
engineering services, construction, modification, expansion, remodeling, structural alteration,
replacements and alterations; except that, costs paid for by the taxpayer with grants or
forgivable loans other than tax credits provided pursuant to state or federal governmental
programs are ineligible;
[(6)] (9) "Eligible residence", a single-family residence forty years of age or older,
located in this state and not within a distressed community as defined by section 135.530,
which is occupied or intended to be occupied or occupied long-term by the owner or offered
for sale at market rate for owner-occupancy and which is either located within a United States
census block group which, if in a metropolitan statistical area, has a median household
income of less than ninety percent, but greater than or equal to seventy percent of the median
household income for the metropolitan statistical area in which the census block group is
located, or which, if located within a United States census block group in a nonmetropolitan
area, has a median household income of less than ninety percent, but greater than or equal to
seventy percent of the median household income for the nonmetropolitan areas in the state;
[(7)] (10) "Flood plain", any land or area susceptible to being inundated by water
from any source or located in a one hundred-year flood plain area determined by Federal
Emergency Management Agency mapping as subject to flooding;
(11) "Historic district", a geographically defined section of a community listed
on the National Register that is formally designated as such by the National Park
Service and the State Historic Preservation Office that encompasses a commonly
recognized downtown where a collection of buildings, structures, and sites possess
significant historical or architectural value and where each property adds to the overall
character of the area;
[(8)] (12) "New residence", a residence constructed on land which if located within a
distressed community has either been vacant for at least two years or is or was occupied by a
structure which has been condemned by the local entity in which the structure is located or
which, if located outside of a distressed community but within a census block group as
described in subdivision (6) or (10) of this section, either replaces a residence forty years of
age or older demolished for purposes of constructing a replacement residence, or which is
constructed on vacant property which has been classified for not less than forty continuous
years as residential or utility, commercial, railroad or other real property pursuant to Article
X, Section 4(b) of the Missouri Constitution, as defined in section 137.016; except that, no

HB 1735 3
new residence shall be constructed in a flood plain or on property used for agricultural
purposes. In a distressed community, the term "new residence" shall include condominiums,
owner-occupied units or other units intended to be owner-occupied in multiple unit structures;
[(9)] (13) "Project", new construction, rehabilitation or substantial rehabilitation of a
residence that qualifies for a tax credit pursuant to sections 135.475 to 135.487;
[(10)] (14) "Qualifying residence", a single-family residence, forty years of age or
older, located in this state which is occupied or intended to be occupied long-term by the
owner or offered for sale at market rate for owner-occupancy and which is located in a
metropolitan statistical area or nonmetropolitan statistical area within a United States census
block group which has a median household income of less than seventy percent of the median
household income for the metropolitan statistical area or nonmetropolitan area, respectively,
or which is located within a distressed community. A qualifying residence shall include a
condominium or residence within a multiple residential structure or a structure containing
multiple single-family residences which is located within a distressed community;
[(11)] (15) "Substantial rehabilitation", rehabilitation the costs of which exceed fifty
percent of either the purchase price or the cost basis of the structure immediately prior to
rehabilitation; provided that, the structure is at least fifty years old notwithstanding any
provision of sections 135.475 to 135.487 to the contrary;
[(12)] (16) "Tax liability", the tax due pursuant to chapter 143, 147 or 148, other than
taxes withheld pursuant to sections 143.191 to 143.265;
[(13)] (17) "Taxpayer", any person, partnership, corporation, trust, limited liability
company, or any charitable organization which is exempt from federal income tax and whose
Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income tax
imposed under chapter 143.
135.481. 1. (1) Any taxpayer who incurs eligible costs for a new residence located in
a distressed community or within a census block group as described in subdivision (10) of
section 135.478, or for a multiple unit condominium described in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, shall receive a tax credit equal to fifteen percent of such costs against his or her
tax liability. The tax credit shall not exceed forty thousand dollars per new residence in any
ten-year period.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a "multiple unit condominium" is one that is
intended to be owner occupied, which is constructed on property subject to an industrial
development contract as defined in section 100.310 and which lies within an area with a city
zoning classification of urban redevelopment district established after January 1, 2000, and
before December 31, 2001, and which is constructed in connection with the qualified
rehabilitation of a structure more than ninety years old eligible for the historic structures

HB 1735 4
rehabilitation tax credit described in sections 253.545 to 253.559, and is under way by
January 1, 2000, and completed by January 1, 2002.
2. Any taxpayer who incurs eligible costs for a new residence located within a census
block as described in subdivision (6) of section 135.478 shall receive a tax credit equal to
fifteen percent of such costs against his or her tax liability. The tax credit shall not exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars per new residence in any ten-year period.
3. Any taxpayer who is not performing substantial rehabilitation and who incurs
eligible costs for rehabilitation of an eligible residence or a qualifying residence shall receive
a tax credit equal to twenty-five percent of such costs against his or her tax liability. The
minimum eligible costs for rehabilitation of an eligible residence shall be ten thousand
dollars. The minimum eligible costs for rehabilitation of a qualifying residence shall be five
thousand dollars. The tax credit shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars in any ten-year
period.
4. Any taxpayer who incurs eligible costs for substantial rehabilitation of a qualifying
residence shall receive a tax credit equal to thirty-five percent of such costs against his or her
tax liability. The minimum eligible costs for substantial rehabilitation of a qualifying
residence shall be ten thousand dollars. The tax credit shall not exceed seventy thousand
dollars in any ten-year period.
5. Any taxpayer who incurs eligible costs for renovation of a critical
revitalization property shall receive a tax credit equal to thirty-five percent of such
costs against his or her tax liability. The minimum eligible costs for renovation of a
critical revitalization property shall be five thousand dollars. The tax credit shall not
exceed one hundred thousand dollars in any ten-year period.
6. A taxpayer shall be eligible to receive tax credits for new construction [or],
rehabilitation, or renovation pursuant to only one subsection of this section.
[6.] 7. No tax credit shall be issued pursuant to this section for any structure which is
in violation of any municipal or county property, maintenance or zoning code.
[7.] 8. No tax credit shall be issued pursuant to sections 135.475 to 135.487 for the
construction or rehabilitation of rental property, except that tax credits may be issued
under subsection 5 of this section for the renovation of rental property qualifying as a
critical revitalization property.
135.484. 1. (1) Beginning January 1, 2000, but ending December 31, 2026, tax
credits shall be allowed pursuant to section 135.481 in an amount not to exceed sixteen
million dollars per year. Of this total amount of tax credits in any given year, eight million
dollars shall be set aside for projects in areas described in subdivision [(6)] (9) of section
135.478 and eight million dollars for projects in areas described in subdivision [(10)] (14) of

HB 1735 5
section 135.478. The maximum tax credit for a project consisting of multiple-unit qualifying
residences in a distressed community shall not exceed three million dollars.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, tax credits shall be allowed under section 135.481
in an amount not to exceed sixteen million dollars per year. Of this total amount of tax
credits in any given year, one million dollars shall be set aside for projects in areas
described in subdivision (9) of section 135.478, seven million dollars shall be set aside for
projects in areas described in subdivision (1) of section 135.478, and eight million dollars
shall be set aside for projects in areas described in subdivision (14) of section 135.478.
The maximum tax credit for a project consisting of multiple-unit qualifying residences
in a distressed community shall not exceed three million dollars.
2. Any amount of credit which exceeds the tax liability of a taxpayer for the tax year
in which the credit is first claimed may be carried back to any of the taxpayer's three prior tax
years and carried forward to any of the taxpayer's five subsequent tax years. A certificate of
tax credit issued to a taxpayer by the department may be assigned, transferred, sold or
otherwise conveyed. Whenever a certificate of tax credit is assigned, transferred, sold or
otherwise conveyed, a notarized endorsement shall be filed with the department specifying
the name and address of the new owner of the tax credit and the value of the credit.
3. The tax credits allowed pursuant to sections 135.475 to 135.487 may not be
claimed in addition to any other state tax credits, with the exception of the historic structures
rehabilitation tax credit authorized pursuant to sections 253.545 to 253.559, which insofar as
sections 135.475 to 135.487 are concerned may be claimed only in conjunction with the tax
credit allowed pursuant to subsection 4 of section 135.481. In order for a taxpayer eligible for
the historic structures rehabilitation tax credit to claim the tax credit allowed pursuant to
subsection 4 of section 135.481, the taxpayer must comply with the requirements of sections
253.545 to 253.559, and in such cases, the amount of the tax credit pursuant to subsection 4 of
section 135.481 shall be limited to the lesser of twenty percent of the taxpayer's eligible costs
or forty thousand dollars. No taxpayer awarded a tax credit under sections 135.475 to
135.487 for the renovation of a critical revitalization property shall also receive a credit
under sections 253.545 to 253.559.
135.487. 1. To obtain any credit allowed pursuant to sections 135.475 to 135.487, a
taxpayer shall submit to the department, for preliminary approval, an application for tax
credit. The director shall, upon final approval of an application and presentation of
acceptable proof of substantial completion of construction, issue the taxpayer a certificate of
tax credit. The director shall issue all credits allowed pursuant to sections 135.475 to 135.487
in the order the applications are received. In the case of a taxpayer other than an owner-
occupant, the director shall not delay the issuance of a tax credit pursuant to sections 135.475
to 135.487 until the sale of a residence at market rate for owner-occupancy. A taxpayer,

HB 1735 6
[taxpayer] other than an owner-occupant who receives a certificate of tax credit pursuant to
sections 135.475 to 135.487 shall, within thirty days of the date of the sale of a residence,
furnish to the director satisfactory proof that such residence was sold at market rate for
owner-occupancy. If the director reasonably determines that a residence was not in good faith
intended for long-term owner occupancy, the director make revoke any tax credits issued and
seek recovery of any tax credits issued pursuant to section 620.017.
2. The department may cooperate with a municipality or a county in which a project
is located to help identify the location of the project, the type and eligibility of the project, the
estimated cost of the project and the completion date of the project.
3. The department shall establish a tax credit application process for taxpayers
who incurred eligible costs for the renovation of a critical revitalization property that
allows for the evaluation of individual property applicants and for the evaluation of
local nonprofit organization applicants that support multiple properties within the same
historic district. The department shall publish the application cycle, the evaluation
criteria, and the process for award and oversight after consultation with statewide and
local historic preservation organizations, community developers, and other interested
parties.
4. The department may promulgate such rules or regulations or issue administrative
guidelines as are necessary to administer the provisions of sections 135.475 to 135.487. No
rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant to the authority of this section shall become
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536.
[4.] 5. The department shall conduct annually a comprehensive program evaluation
illustrating where the tax credits allowed pursuant to sections 135.475 to 135.487 are being
utilized, explaining the economic impact of such program and making recommendations on
appropriate program modifications to ensure the program's success.
✔